Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 4 STATEWIDE MANAGED CARE SYSTEM
25.5-5-408. Capitation payments - availability of base data - adjustments - rate calculation - capitation payment proposal - preference - assignment of medicaid recipients - definition.

The state department shall make capitation payments to MCEs based upon a defined scope of services under a risk contract.

A certification by a qualified actuary retained by the state department is conclusive evidence that the state department has correctly calculated the direct health-care cost of providing these same services on an actuarially equivalent Colorado medicaid population group.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (1)(d) of this section and where the state department has instituted a program of competitive bidding provided in section 25.5-5-402 (9), the state department may utilize a market rate set through the competitive bid process for a set of defined services. The state department shall only use market rate bids that do not discriminate and are adequate to assure quality and network sufficiency. A certification of a qualified actuary, retained by the state department, to the appropriate lower limit is conclusive evidence of the state department's compliance with the requirements of this subsection (1)(c). For the purposes of this subsection (1), a "qualified actuary" means a person deemed as such under rules promulgated by the commissioner of insurance.

The state department shall reimburse a federally qualified health center, as defined in the federal "Social Security Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 1395x (aa)(4), for the total reasonable costs incurred by the center in providing health-care services to all recipients of medical assistance.

An MCE shall certify, as a condition of entering into a contract with the state department, that the capitation payments set forth in the contract between the MCE and the state department are sufficient to ensure the financial stability of the MCE with respect to delivery of services to the medicaid recipients covered in the contract.

Except as provided in subsection (1)(f)(II) of this section, for capitation payments effective on and after July 1, 2003, an MCE that is contracting for a defined scope of services under a risk contract shall certify, through a qualified actuary retained by the MCE, that the capitation payments set forth in the contract between the MCE and the state department comply with all applicable federal and state requirements that govern the capitation payments. For purposes of this subsection (1)(f)(I), a "qualified actuary" means a person deemed as such by rule promulgated by the commissioner of insurance.

An MCO providing services under the PACE program as described in section 25.5-5-412 shall certify that the capitation payments are in compliance with applicable federal and state requirements that govern said capitation payments and that the capitation payments are sufficient to ensure the financial viability of the MCO with respect to the delivery of services to the PACE program participants covered in the contract.

The state department shall develop capitation rates for MCEs contracting for a defined scope of services under a risk contract that include risk adjustments, reinsurance, or stop-loss funding methods. Payments to plans may vary when it is shown through diagnoses or other relevant data that certain populations are expected to cost more or less than the capitated population as a whole.

The state board, in consultation with recognized medical authorities, shall develop a definition of special needs populations that includes evidence of diagnosed or medically confirmed health conditions. The state department shall develop a method for adjusting payments to plans for such special needs populations when diagnoses or other relevant data indicates these special needs populations would cost significantly more than similarly capitated populations.

Under no circumstances shall the risk adjustments, reinsurance, or stop-loss methods developed by the state department pursuant to subsection (2) of this section cause the average per capita medicaid payment to a plan to be greater than the projected medicaid expenditures for treating medicaid enrollees of that plan under fee-for-service medicaid.

The state department may develop quality incentive payments to recognize superior quality of care or service provided by a managed care plan.

Within two hundred ten days from the beginning of each fiscal year, the state department, in cooperation with the MCEs, shall set a timeline for the rate-setting process for the following fiscal year's rates and for the provision of base data to the MCEs that is used in the calculation of the rates, which must include but not be limited to the information included in subsection (7) of this section.

The state department shall identify and make available to the MCEs the base data used in the calculation of the direct health-care cost of providing these same services on an actuarially equivalent Colorado medicaid population group. The state department shall consult with the MCEs regarding any and all adjustments in the base data made to arrive at the capitation payments.

For capitation payments effective on and after July 1, 2003, the state department shall recalculate the base calculation every three years. The three-year cycle for the recalculation of the base calculation shall begin with capitation payments effective for fiscal year 2003-04. In the years in which the base calculation is not recalculated, the state department shall annually trend the base calculation after consulting with the MCEs. The state department shall take into consideration when trending the base calculation any public policy changes that affect reimbursement under the "Colorado Medical Assistance Act".

The rate-setting process referenced in subsection (6) of this section must include a time period after the MCEs have received the direct health-care cost of providing these same services on an actuarially equivalent Colorado medicaid population group for each MCE to submit to the state department the MCE's capitation payment proposal, which must not exceed one hundred percent of the direct health-care cost of providing these same services on an actuarially equivalent Colorado medicaid population group. The state department shall provide to the MCEs the MCE's specific adjustments to be included in the calculation of the MCE's proposal. Each MCE's capitation payment proposal must meet the requirements of subsections (1)(e) and (1)(f) of this section and section 25.5-5-402 (10).

For capitation payments effective on and after July 1, 2003, unless otherwise required by federal law, the state department shall certify, through a qualified actuary retained by the state department, that the capitation payments set forth in the contract between the state department and the MCEs comply with all applicable federal and state requirements that govern said capitation payments.

Effective on and after July 1, 2003, the capitation payments certified by the qualified actuary under subsection (10) of this section shall not be subject to any dispute resolution process, including any such process set forth in any settlement agreement entered into prior to July 1, 2002.

Nothing in this section shall prevent, to the extent possible, an MCE that is also a government-owned entity from using certified public expenditure or other federally recognized financing mechanisms to provide the state share for the federal match to enhance capitation payments up to or above the one hundred percent limit contained in subsection (9) of this section. The state shall not be obligated to increase any general fund expenditures because of the use of certified public expenditure or other federally recognized financing mechanism pursuant to this subsection (12).

A PIHP agreement may include a provision for a quality incentive payment that is distributed to the contractor within a reasonable period of time, as specified in the contract, following the end of each fiscal year if the contractor substantially exceeds predetermined quality indicators. The quality indicators must be based upon broadly accepted measures of performance adopted by rule of the state board and agreed upon at the outset of the contract period, and must include, but need not be limited to, the health plan employers data and information set measures. The quality incentive payment may be made proportional if the state board establishes multiple quality measurements. The quality incentive payments must not exceed the total cost savings created under the PIHP agreement, as determined by comparison of the PIHP members with an actuarially equivalent fee-for-service population, and the quality incentive payment must not exceed five percent of the total medicaid payments received by the contractor during the performance period of the PIHP agreement.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1893, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1)(b) and (9) amended and (12) added, p. 1354, § 4, effective May 29.

L. 2008:

(1)(a), (2), (6), (7), (8), (9), (10), and (12) amended, p. 400, § 5, effective August 5.

L. 2009:

(1)(a) amended, (SB 09-265), ch. 205, p. 936, § 4, effective May 1.

L. 2010:

(1)(a)(II) repealed, (HB 10-1382), ch. 217, p. 939, § 3, effective May 6.

L. 2018:

(1) amended with relocations, (6), (7), and (9) amended, and (13) added with relocations, (HB 18-1431), ch. 313, p. 1887, § 4, effective August 8.

L. 2020:

(1)(d) amended, (SB 20-136), ch. 70, p. 289, § 28, effective September 14.

25.5-5-409. State department - privatization. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1896, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

Entire section repealed, (HB 18-1431), ch. 313, p. 1891, § 7, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 26-4-120 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-5-410. Data collection for managed care programs.

Repealed.

The state department of human services, in conjunction with the state department, shall continue its existing efforts, which include obtaining and considering consumer input, to develop managed care systems for the developmentally disabled population and to consider a pilot program for a certificate system to enable the developmentally disabled population to purchase managed care services or fee-for-service care, including long-term care community services. The department of human services shall not implement any managed care system for developmentally disabled services without the express approval of the joint budget committee. Any proposed implementation of fully capitated managed care in the developmental disabilities community service system shall require legislative review.

In addition to any other data collection and reporting requirements, each managed care organization shall submit the following types of data to the state department or its agent:

Medical access;

Consumer outcomes based on statistics maintained on individual consumers as well as the total consumer populations served;

Consumer satisfaction;

Consumer utilization;

Health status of consumers; and

Uncompensated care delivered.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1896, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1) amended, p. 402, § 6, effective August 5.

L. 2016:

(1) repealed and (2) amended, (HB 16-1081), ch. 22, p. 51, § 3, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-121 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-5-411. Medicaid community mental health services - legislative declaration - administration - rules. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1897, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(3) amended, p. 331, § 1, effective August 3.

L. 2008:

(1.5) added, p. 289, § 1, effective April 3.

L. 2009:

(1.5)(c) added, (SB 09-265), ch. 205, p. 936, § 5, effective May 1.

L. 2010:

(4)(c) repealed, (HB 10-1382), ch. 217, p. 940, § 4, effective May 6; entire section amended, (SB 10-153), ch. 295, p. 1372, § 3, effective May 26.

L. 2018:

Entire section repealed, (HB 18-1431), ch. 313, p. 1891, § 7, effective August 8; (4)(b) amended, (HB 18-1007), ch. 225, p. 1432, § 5, effective January 1, 2019; (4)(b) repealed, (HB 18-1431), ch. 313, p. 1893, § 13, effective January 1, 2019.

25.5-5-412. Program of all-inclusive care for the elderly - services - eligibility - legislative declaration - rules - definitions.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that it is the intent of this section to replicate the ON LOK program in San Francisco, California, that has proven to be cost-effective at both the state and federal levels. The PACE program is part of a national replication project authorized in section 9412(b)(2) of the federal "Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1986", as amended. The general assembly finds that, by coordinating an extensive array of medical and nonmedical services, the needs of the participants will be met primarily in an outpatient environment in an adult day health center, in their homes, or in an institutional setting. The general assembly finds that such a service delivery system will enhance the quality of life for the participant and offers the potential to reduce and cap the costs to Colorado of the medical needs of the participants, including hospital and nursing home admissions.

Repealed.

The general assembly has determined on the recommendation of the state department that the PACE program is cost-effective. As a result of such determination and after consultation with the joint budget committee of the general assembly, application has been made to and waivers have been obtained from the federal health care financing administration to implement the PACE program as provided in this section. The general assembly, therefore, authorizes the state department to implement the PACE program in accordance with this section. In connection with the implementation of the program, the state department shall:

Provide a system for reimbursement for services to the PACE program pursuant to this section;

Develop and implement a contract with any public, private, nonprofit, or for-profit entity providing the PACE program, as permitted by federal law, that sets forth contractual obligations for the PACE program as required by the state department, including but not limited to reporting and monitoring of utilization of services and of the costs of the program, quality of care, and a comprehensive assessment of the provider's fiscal soundness;

Acknowledge that it is participating in the national PACE project as initiated by congress;

Be responsible for certifying the eligibility for services of all PACE program participants.

The general assembly declares that the purpose of this section is to provide services that would foster the following goals:

To maintain eligible persons at home as an alternative to long-term institutionalization;

To provide optimum accessibility to various important social and health resources that are available to assist eligible persons in maintaining independent living;

To provide that eligible persons who are frail elderly but who have the capacity to remain in an independent living situation have access to the appropriate social and health services without which independent living would not be possible;

To coordinate, integrate, and link such social and health services by removing obstacles that impede or limit improvements in delivery of these services;

To provide the most efficient and effective use of capitated funds in the delivery of such social and health services.

Repealed.

Within the context of the PACE program, the state department may include any or all of the services listed in sections 25.5-5-102, 25.5-5-103, 25.5-5-202, and 25.5-5-203, as applicable.

An eligible person may elect to receive services from the PACE program as described in subsection (4) of this section. If such an election is made, the eligible person shall not remain eligible for services or payment through the regular medicare or medicaid programs. All services provided by said programs shall be provided through the PACE program in accordance with this section. An eligible person may elect to disenroll from the PACE program at any time.

[Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion to subsection (6) is effective until July 1, 2024.] The state department, in cooperation with the single entry point agencies established in section 25.5-6-106, shall develop and implement a coordinated plan to provide education about PACE program site operations under this section. The state board shall adopt rules:

(6)

[

Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion to subsection (6) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

The state department, in cooperation with the case management agencies established in section 25.5-6-1703, shall develop and implement a coordinated plan to provide education about PACE program site operations under this section. The state board shall adopt rules:

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (6)(a) is effective until July 1, 2024.] To ensure that case managers and any other appropriate state department staff discuss the option and potential benefits of participating in the PACE program with all eligible long-term care clients. These rules shall require additional and on-going training of the single entry point agency case managers in counties where a PACE program is operating. This training shall be provided by a federally approved PACE provider. In addition, each single entry point agency may designate case managers who have knowledge about the PACE program.

(a)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (6)(a) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

To ensure that case managers and any other appropriate state department staff discuss the option and potential benefits of participating in the PACE program with all eligible long-term care clients. These rules must require additional and on-going training of the case management agency case managers in counties where a PACE program is operating. This training must be provided by a federally approved PACE provider. In addition, each case management agency may designate case managers who have knowledge about the PACE program.

To allow PACE providers to contract with an enrollment broker to include the PACE program in its marketing materials to eligible long-term clients.

(6.5) An eligible person who is enrolled in a managed care organization, an organization contracted with the state department pursuant to part 4 of article 5 of this title, or other risk-bearing entity may elect to withdraw from or terminate such enrollment and enroll in and receive services through a PACE program. The state board's rules shall define how such election is made. The effective date of an eligible person's election shall not be more than thirty days after the eligible person's date of election.

For purposes of this section:

"Dually eligible person" means a person who is eligible for assistance or benefits under both medicaid and medicare.

"Eligible person" means a frail elderly individual who voluntarily enrolls in the PACE program and whose gross income does not exceed three hundred percent of the current federal supplemental security income benefit level, whose resources do not exceed the limit established by the state department of human services for individuals receiving a mandatory minimum state supplementation of SSI benefits pursuant to section 26-2-204, or in the case of a person who is married, do not exceed the amount authorized in section 25.5-6-101, and for whom a physician licensed pursuant to article 240 of title 12 certifies that such a program provides an appropriate alternative to institutionalized care. "Eligible person" may also include a dually eligible person.

"Frail elderly" means an individual who meets functional eligibility requirements, as established by the state department, for nursing home care and who is fifty-five years of age or older.

"Upper payment limit" means a federal upper payment limit on the amount of the medicaid payment for which federal financial participation is available for a class of services and a class of health-care providers, as specified in 42 CFR 447.

Using a risk-based financing model, any public, private, nonprofit, or for-profit entity providing the PACE program, as permitted by federal law, shall assume responsibility for all costs generated by PACE program participants, and shall create and maintain a risk reserve fund that will cover any cost overages for any participant. The PACE program is responsible for the entire range of services in the consolidated service model, including hospital and nursing home care, according to participant need as determined by the multidisciplinary team. Any public, private, nonprofit, or for-profit entity providing the PACE program, as permitted by federal law, is responsible for the full financial risk at the conclusion of the demonstration period and when permanent waivers from the federal health care financing administration are granted. Specific arrangements of the risk-based financing model shall be adopted and negotiated by the federal health care financing administration, any public, private, nonprofit, or for-profit entity providing the PACE program, as permitted by federal law, and the state department.

Nothing in this section requires a PACE program site operator to hold a certificate of authority as a health maintenance organization under part 4 of article 16 of title 10, C.R.S., for purposes of the PACE program.

The state department shall perform a feasibility study, conditioned on the receipt of sufficient gifts, grants, and donations, in order to identify viable communities that may support a PACE program site. This study shall be completed on or before May 1, 2003.

The state department, consistent with the results of the feasibility study, shall use its best efforts to have in operation:

One additional PACE program site by July 1, 2004;

A total of four additional PACE program sites by July 1, 2005; and

A total of six additional PACE program sites by July 1, 2006.

No later than May 30, 2003, the executive director of the state department shall submit to the joint budget committee of the general assembly and to the health and human services committees of the house of representatives and the senate, or any successor committees, a written report of the results of the feasibility study conducted under paragraph (a) of this subsection (10).

No later than January 1, 2007, the executive director of the state department shall submit to the joint budget committee of the general assembly and to the health and human services committees of the house of representatives and the senate, or any successor committees, a final written report detailing the expansion of PACE program sites across the state.

The state board shall promulgate such rules, pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., as are necessary to implement this section.

The general assembly shall make appropriations to the state department to fund services under this section provided at a monthly capitated rate. For the 2019-20 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, the state department shall annually renegotiate, pursuant to the provisions set forth in this subsection (12), a monthly capitated rate for the contracted services.

The monthly capitated rate negotiated with the state department must be included in the contract with the PACE organization and must be based upon a prospective monthly capitation payment to a PACE organization for a medicaid participant enrolled in a PACE program that is less than what would otherwise have been paid under the state medicaid plan if the participant were not enrolled in the PACE program.

In determining the monthly capitated rate, the state department, with the participation of Colorado PACE organizations, shall develop an actuarially sound upper payment limit methodology that complies with federal law relating to PACE organizations.

Repealed.

The state department may accept grants and donations from private sources for the purpose of implementing this section.

No later than sixty days prior to the closing or effective date of a conversion of a nonprofit PACE provider to a for-profit PACE provider, the nonprofit PACE provider shall:

Transmit a conversion plan and written notice of the conversion to the attorney general, which conversion plan must include, at a minimum:

A copy of the results of an independent valuation of the fair market value of the business that proposes to convert;

A detailed explanation of the plans for distribution of the proceeds of the conversion, including whether the proceeds will be distributed to a new nonprofit entity or to an existing organization and, if to an existing nonprofit organization, which organization and the reasons for selecting that organization, or, if to a new nonprofit organization, how the initial board of directors will be selected;

Information about any compensation, bonus, or inducement to any officers or directors of the converting entity resulting from the conversion; and

The PACE organization's audited financial statements for its three most recent fiscal years for Colorado, and separately, for those operations outside of Colorado, for any such operations that may be related to the conversion; and

Bear all costs associated with public oversight and review by the attorney general of the conversion, including the retention of outside experts, if any.

Within ten days after the receipt of the conversion plan, the attorney general shall post the complete conversion plan on its website and receive public comments about the plan, which shall also be posted as soon as practicable to the attorney general's website. Public comment shall be received for a minimum of thirty days and available on the website for at least the duration of the comment period.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the common law authority of the attorney general.

No later than June 30, 2023, the state department, in conjunction with the department of public health and environment, shall develop a regulatory plan to establish formal oversight requirements for PACE entities. In developing the plan, the departments shall consider, at a minimum:

Input from executive agencies; any local governments within a PACE service area, including cities and counties; aging and older adult advocacy organizations; PACE participants; family members of PACE participants; disability advocacy organizations; urban PACE entities; rural PACE entities; and PACE trade organizations;

State department demographic data to determine the feasibility of potential or existing PACE entities to establish or expand within a specific geographical area with an established PACE program;

Utilization, quality, and performance data of each PACE entity and associated PACE entities;

Business continuity and solvency information of each PACE entity or associated PACE entities;

Measurable innovative practices of PACE entities;

Staffing practices of PACE entities;

Transportation data of each PACE entity, including the number of trips, travel time, and pick-up and drop-off processes;

Satisfaction and exit survey data of each PACE entity;

Audits, complaints, and grievances of each PACE entity;

Current PACE oversight processes, including home health regulatory requirements and licensure;

Any duplication of federal oversight processes;

Due process and appeal rights of PACE entities; and

Citations, fines, and suspension remedies to ensure compliance with regulations to protect the health, safety, and welfare of medicaid members.

No later than March 1, 2024, the state department shall establish, administer, and enforce minimum regulatory standards and rules for the PACE program, including for contracted entities of the PACE program. The standards and rules must be sufficient to ensure the health, safety, and welfare of PACE participants.

The state department shall continually analyze the reimbursement methodology for PACE entities and provide an update to the house of representatives public and behavioral health and human services committee, the senate health and human services committee, and the joint budget committee, or their successor committees, of any new methodology requirements that incorporate encounter data and any associated cost to the state department in overseeing PACE entities.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1898, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(12) amended, p. 1749, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 2009:

(12) amended, (SB 09-265), ch. 205, p. 936, § 6, effective May 1.

L. 2010:

(12)(b) repealed, (HB 10-1382), ch. 217, p. 940, § 5, effective May 6.

L. 2012:

(6) and (7) amended and (6.5) added, (SB 12-023), ch. 94, p. 308, § 1, effective April 12.

L. 2013:

(3)(f) repealed, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1690, § 81, effective August 7.

L. 2015:

(1)(a), (2)(b), and (8) amended, (1)(b) repealed, and (14) added, (SB 15-137), ch. 163, pp. 496, 498, §§ 1, 2, effective August 5.

L. 2016:

(7)(d) added and (12) amended, (SB 16-199), ch. 270, p. 1117, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2019:

(12) amended, (SB 19-209), ch. 124, p. 534, § 1, effective April 17; (7)(b) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1709, § 184, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

IP(6) and (6)(a) amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 333, § 28, effective July 1, 2024.

L. 2022:

(15) added, (SB 22-203), ch. 450, p. 3168, § 1, effective August 10.

25.5-5-413. Direct contracting with providers - legislative declaration. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1902, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

Entire section repealed, (HB 18-1431), ch. 313, p. 1891, § 7, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 26-4-127 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-5-414. Telemedicine - legislative intent.

It is the intent of the general assembly to recognize the practice of telemedicine as a legitimate means by which an individual may receive medical services from a health-care provider without person-to-person contact with a provider.

Repealed.

On or after January 1, 2002, face-to-face contact between a health-care provider and a patient is not required under the statewide managed care system created in this part 4 for services appropriately provided through telemedicine, subject to reimbursement policies developed by the state department to compensate providers who provide health-care services covered by the program created in section 25.5-4-104. Telemedicine services may only be used in areas of the state where the technology necessary for the provision of telemedicine exists. The audio and visual telemedicine system used must, at a minimum, have the capability to meet the procedural definition of the most recent edition of the current procedural terminology that represents the service provided through telemedicine. The telecommunications equipment must be of a level of quality to adequately complete all necessary components to document the level of service for the current procedural terminology fourth edition codes that are billed. If a peripheral diagnostic scope is required to assess the patient, it must provide adequate resolution or audio quality for decision-making.

Repealed.

The statewide managed care system is not required to pay for consultation provided by a provider by telephone or facsimile machines.

The state department may accept and expend gifts, grants, and donations from any source to conduct the valuation of the cost-effectiveness and quality of health care provided through telemedicine by those providers who are reimbursed for telemedicine services by the statewide managed care system.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to:

Alter the scope of practice of any health-care provider; or

Authorize the delivery of health-care services in a setting or manner not otherwise authorized by law.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1903, § 7, effective July 1; (3) amended and (7) added, p. 1547, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(3), (5), and (6) amended and (4) repealed, (HB 18-1431), ch. 313, p. 1889, § 5, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

(2) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1710, § 185, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

(2) repealed, (HB 21-1190), ch. 152, p. 875, § 4, effective May 18.